District of Columbia statutes.
16-1356

Setting date for trial.

In a proceeding pursuant to this subchapter, after all defendants have been served with notice, and there has been return of service, as provided by rule 71A(d) of the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure , and after defendants have appeared or answered in the manner provided by rule 71A(e) thereof, either personally or by their guardians ad litem or other legal representatives, or are in default, the case shall be regarded as ready for trial, and, upon the application of any party to the proceeding, the court shall forthwith set an early date to be fixed by it, not less than ten nor more than twenty days from the date of the application, for the trial of the issues of law and fact raised in the case, and the ascertainment of the compensation or damages to be awarded for the taking of the property to be condemned.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 578, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Section References

This section is referenced in § 16-1357.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-1356.
1973 Ed., § 16-1356.